Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,180
Opening and closing vehicle doors; restriction.

No person shall open the door of a motor vehicle on the side available to moving traffic unless and until it is reasonably safe to do so and it can be done without interfering with the movement of other traffic, nor shall any person leave a door open on the side of a vehicle available to moving traffic for a period of time longer than necessary to load or unload property or passengers.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 78;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-678;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 276.